Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.340

Notice of discharge to contain notice of right to appeal if available.

Any notice of discharge given to a classified or certificated employee, if that employee has a right to appeal the discharge, shall contain notice of that right, notice that a description of the appeal process is available, and how the description of the appeal process may be obtained.

[ 1991 c 102 s 1.]